Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1144.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9720.9. Sentencing for certain aggravated cruelty to animal offenses.(a) Sentencing enhancement.-- The Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing, in accordance with section 2154 (relating to adoption of guidelines for sentencing), shall provide for a sentence enhancement within its guidelines for an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. § 5534(a)(2) (relating to aggravated cruelty to animal) specifying variations from the range of sentences applicable based on the aggravating circumstance of the offense committed using a deadly weapon.(b) Definition.--As used in this section, the following 12345678910111213141516171819 words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Deadly weapon." Any of the following:(1) A firearm as defined under section 9712(e) (relating to sentences for offenses committed with firearms), whether loaded or unloaded.(2) A dangerous weapon as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 913(f) (relating to possession of firearm or other dangerous weapon in court facility).(3) Any device, implement or instrumentality capable of producing death or serious bodily injury.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1144PN1395 - 2 - 123456789101112